California statutes. Financial Code
It is the intent of the Legislature that this division shall be administered and enforced with sufficient program resources and funding including personnel to examine licensees as often as the commissioner deems necessary and appropriate but at least once every two years, and to authorize enforcement actions that are necessary and appropriate to protect the public. This act should be administered and enforced only to the extent funds are appropriated by the Legislature and made available for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Provisions of this section are operative (no later than Dec. 31, 2004) as prescribed in Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23104.

Except as provided in this article, the provisions of this division shall become effective on January 1, 2003, and shall become operative on December 31, 2004. However, the commissioner shall have the power and authority to implement the provisions of this division prior to December 31, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 17, Sec. 18.   Effective February 23, 2004.   Note: This section prescribes the operative date (no later than Dec. 31, 2004) for provisions of Division 10, commencing with Section 23000.  See also Stats. 2004, Ch. 17, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

23105.

The provisions of this division are severable. If any provision of this division or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Provisions of this section are operative (no later than Dec. 31, 2004) as prescribed in Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23106.

This division creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Provisions of this section are operative (no later than Dec. 31, 2004) as prescribed in Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10.5. FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT FUND [24000. - 24002.]

24000.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Financial Empowerment Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the Commissioner of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation for purposes of the act.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Controller shall, on July 1, 2020, transfer from the State Corporations Fund to the Financial Empowerment Fund the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) plus an amount estimated by the department to be the reasonable costs to administer the division.

(c) The Commissioner of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall use moneys in the Financial Empowerment Fund for allocation to fund financial education and financial empowerment programs and services for at-risk populations in California, as described in Section 24001. The commissioner may additionally use moneys in the Financial Empowerment Fund to cover its costs to administer this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 3.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 24002.)
-------------------------------------------

24001.

(a) The Commissioner of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall administer an application process for grants of up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per applicant from the Financial Empowerment Fund or shall contract with an independent third party to do so on the department’s behalf. The commissioner, or the independent third party designated by the commissioner, may award up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) in grant moneys per fiscal year. To be eligible for selection by the department to administer the grant program, an independent third party shall cap its administrative fees at no more than 15 percent of the grant moneys it administers on the department’s behalf.

(b) An applicant shall apply to the commissioner or to an independent third party designated by the commissioner for a grant in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner or the independent third party. To be eligible for a grant, an applicant shall meet both of the following criteria:

(1) The organization is exempt from federal income taxes under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is organized and operated exclusively for one or more of the purposes described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) No part of the net earnings of the organization shall inure to the benefit of a private shareholder or individual.

(c) A grantee shall only use grant moneys for the following financial education and financial empowerment programs and services for at-risk populations:

(1) Designing, developing, or offering, free of charge to consumers, classroom- or web-based financial education and empowerment content intended to help unbanked and underbanked consumers achieve, identify, and access lower cost financial products and services, establish or improve their credit, increase their savings, or lower their debt.

(2) Providing individualized, free financial coaching to unbanked and underbanked consumers.

(3) Designing, developing, or offering,
 free of charge to consumers, a financial product or service intended to help unbanked and underbanked consumers identify and access responsible financial products and financial services, establish or improve their credit, increase their savings, or lower their debt.

(d) A grantee shall use no more than 15 percent of its grant to cover its administrative costs. Failure to comply with this requirement shall render the organization ineligible for grant funding during the subsequent fiscal year.

(e) Every project funded with a grant from the Financial Empowerment Fund shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Promote and enhance the economic security of consumers.

(2) Adhere to the five principles of effective financial education described in the June
 2017 report, “Effective financial education: Five principles and how to use them,” issued by the federal Consumer Financial Protection Bureau.

(3) Include one or more specific outcome targets.

(4) Include an evaluation component designed to measure and document the extent to which the project achieves its intended outcomes and increases consumers’ financial well-being.

(f) Each grantee shall submit a report, in a form and by a date acceptable to the Commissioner of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation documenting the specific uses to which grant funds were allocated, documenting the number of individuals aided through use of the funds, providing quantitative results regarding the impact of grant funding, and including any other information requested by the commissioner. Failure to submit a report shall render the organization ineligible for grant funding during the subsequent fiscal year.

(g) On or before December 31, 2021, and at least once annually thereafter, the department shall post on its internet website a summary of the information received from grantees pursuant to subdivision (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 4.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 24002.)
-------------------------------------------

24002.

(a) This division shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(b) Upon the repeal of this division, the Controller shall transfer any moneys remaining in the Financial Empowerment Fund to the Financial Protection Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 5.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Division 10.5, commencing with Section 24000.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11.5. NATIONAL HOUSING ACT LOANS [27000. - 27050.]



CHAPTER 1. Investments [27000. - 27004.]

27000.

Insurance companies, personal finance companies, mortgage companies, mortgage insurance companies, building and loan associations, trust companies, fiduciaries, or fiduciary institutions may invest in, or purchase such classes of first liens as are commonly given to secure advances on, or the unpaid purchase price of real estate, including any part of an issue of notes or bonds secured by such first liens, which have been accepted for insurance by the Federal Housing Administrator. The investment or purchase may be made with their funds or the money in their custody or possesion, including but not being restricted to, all trust funds or funds the investment of which is
 regulated by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

27001.

Insurance companies, personal finance companies, mortgage companies, mortgage insurance companies, building and loan associations, trust companies, fiduciaries, fiduciary institutions, or public or private agencies may invest in, or purchase obligations of national mortgage associations. The investment or purchase may be made with their funds or the money in their custody or possession, including but not being restricted to, all trust funds, or funds the investment of which is regulated by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

27002.

Insurance companies, personal finance companies, mortgage companies, or mortgage insurance companies may make, invest in, or purchase loans or advances of credit insured by the Federal Housing Administrator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

27003.

Insurance companies, personal finance companies, mortgage companies, mortgage insurance companies, building and loan associations, or trust companies may make such loans secured by real property or leasehold, as the Federal Housing Administrator insures, or makes a commitment to insure, and may obtain such insurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

27004.

No law of this State, prescribing the nature, amount or form of security or requiring security upon which loans or investments may be made, or prescribing or limiting interest rates upon loans or advances of credit or prescribing or limiting the period for which loans or investments may be made, applies to loans or investments made pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Securities for Deposit [27050. - 27050.]

27050.

Wherever, by statute of this State, collateral is required as security for the deposit of public or other funds, or deposits are required to be made with any public official or department, or an investment of capital or surplus, or a reserve or other fund, is required to be maintained consisting of designated securities, the notes, and bonds secured by mortgages insured, and debentures issued, by the Federal Housing Administrator, and obligations of national mortgage associations are eligible securities for such purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. COLLEGE LOANS [28000. - 28001.]

28000.

(a) Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the State Constitution, and subject to subdivision (b), educational institutions of collegiate grade are authorized to make loans or forbearances to finance student educational expenses including tuition, room, and board, and other costs of attendance or living at the institution, at rates not to exceed the higher of:

(1) Ten percent per annum.

(2) Five percent per annum plus the rate established by the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco on advances to member banks under Sections 13 and 13(a) of the Federal Reserve Act as now in effect or hereafter from time to time amended or, if there is no such single determinable rate of advances, the closest counterpart of this rate as shall be designated by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions of the State of California unless some other person or agency is delegated such authority by the Legislature. The date of determining the applicable rate established by the Federal Reserve bank shall be the 25th day of the month preceding the earlier of the date of execution of the contract to make the loan or forbearance, or the date of making the loan or forbearance.

(b) Where the institution has obtained a loan specifically in order to make loans to finance student educational expenses, the rate of interest shall not exceed the
lower of:

(1) The rate determined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) One percentage point in excess of the interest rate imposed upon the loan made to the institution, as of the date of execution of the contract to make the student loan to such extent the foregoing creates and authorizes a class of exempt persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution.

(c) Solely with respect to loans or forbearances made by educational institutions of collegiate grade to their faculty or staff, secured by real property consisting of a residential dwelling, these institutions are hereby declared to be an exempt class of persons as this term is used in Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 618.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

28001.

This division shall not apply to community colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12.5. STUDENT LOAN SERVICING ACT [28100. - 28182.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [28100. - 28104.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [28100. - 28100.]

28100.

This division may be known and cited as the “Student Loan Servicing Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Requirement for License [28102. - 28102.]

28102.

(a) No person shall engage in the business of servicing a student loan in this state without first obtaining a license pursuant to this division. A license shall not be transferable or assignable.

(b) This division shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A bank, trust company, or industrial loan company doing business under the authority of, or in accordance with, a license, certificate, or charter issued by the United States or any state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(2) A
 federally chartered savings and loan association, federal savings bank, or federal credit union that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(3) A savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union organized under the laws of this or any other state that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(4) A public postsecondary educational institution or a private nonprofit postsecondary educational institution servicing a student loan it extended to the borrower.

(5) A nonprofit community service organization that meets all the criteria of Section 12104.

(6) In connection with its responsibilities as a
 guaranty agency engaged in default aversion, a state or nonprofit private institution or organization having an agreement with the United States Secretary of Education under Section 428(b) of the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1078(b)).

(c) A private postsecondary educational institution not exempted from the requirements of this division pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be required to comply with this division for the servicing of a student loan it extended to a borrower that a licensee is servicing pursuant to a servicing agreement with the private postsecondary educational institution for that student loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 2.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Definitions [28104. - 28104.]

28104.

For the purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Applicant” means a person applying for a license pursuant to this division.

(b) “Borrower” means either of the following:

(1) A person who has received or agreed to pay a student loan.

(2) A person who shares responsibility for repaying a student loan with a person described in paragraph (1).

(c) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(d) “Default aversion” means those activities in which guaranty agencies engage to prevent default by a borrower pursuant to the law and regulations of the Federal Family Education Loan Program.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(f) “Engage in the business” means, without limitation, servicing student loans.

(g) “In this state” means any activity of a person relating to servicing student loans that originates from this state and is directed to persons outside this state, or that originates from outside this state and is directed to persons inside this state, or that originates inside this state and is directed to persons inside this state.

(h) “Licensee” means a person licensed pursuant to this
 division.

(i) “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry” means a system of record, created by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators, for nondepository, financial services licensing or registration, including student loan servicers, in participating state agencies, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, and Guam.

(j) “Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, an association, a trust, an unincorporated organization, a government, or a political subdivision of a government, and any other entity.

(k) “Servicing” means any of the following activities related to a student loan of a borrower:

(1) Performing both of the following:

(A) Receiving any scheduled periodic payments from a borrower or any notification that a borrower made a scheduled periodic payment.

(B) Applying payments to the borrower’s account pursuant to the terms of the student loan or the contract governing the servicing.

(2) During a period when no payment is required on a student loan, performing both of the following:

(A) Maintaining account records for the student loan.

(B) Communicating with the borrower regarding the student loan on behalf of the owner of the student loan promissory note.

(3) Interacting with a borrower related
 to that borrower’s student loan, with the goal of helping the borrower avoid default on the borrower’s student loan or facilitating the activities described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(l) (1) “Student loan” means any loan made solely for use to finance a postsecondary education and costs of attendance at a postsecondary institution, including, but not limited to, tuition, fees, books and supplies, room and board, transportation, and miscellaneous personal expenses. A “student loan” includes a loan made to refinance a student loan.

(2) (A) A “student loan” shall not include an extension of credit under an open-end consumer credit plan, a reverse mortgage transaction, a residential mortgage transaction, or any other loan that is secured by real property or a dwelling.

(B) A
 “student loan” shall not include an extension of credit made by a postsecondary educational institution to a borrower if one of the following applies:

(i) The term of the extension of credit is no longer than the borrower’s education program.

(ii) The remaining, unpaid principal balance of the extension of credit is less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) at the time of the borrower’s graduation or completion of the program.

(iii) The borrower fails to graduate or successfully complete the borrower’s education program and has a balance due at the time of the borrower’s disenrollment from the postsecondary institution.

(m) “Student loan servicer” means any person engaged in the business of servicing student loans. A “student loan servicer”
 does not include a debt collector, as defined in Section 1788.2 of the Civil Code, whose student loan debt collection business, and business operations, involve collecting, or attempting to collect, on defaulted student loans, that is, federal student loans for which no payment has been received for 270 days or more, or private student loans, in default, according to the terms of the loan documents. Debt collectors who also service nondefaulted student loans, as part of their business, and business operations, are “student loan servicers.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 151.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Licensing [28106. - 28125.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation [28106. - 28111.]

28106.

(a) The commissioner shall administer the provisions of this division and may promulgate rules and regulations and issue orders consistent with that authority.

(b) Without limitation, the functions, powers, and duties of the commissioner include all of the following:

(1) To issue or refuse to issue a license as provided by this division.

(2) To revoke or suspend for cause any license as provided by this division.

(3) To keep records of licenses issued under this division.

(4) To receive, consider, investigate, and act upon complaints made in connection with a licensee.

(5) To prescribe the forms of and receive (A) applications for licenses and (B) reports, books, and records required to be made by a licensee under this division, including annual audited financial statements.

(6) To subpoena documents and witnesses and compel their attendance and production, to administer oaths, and to require the production of books, papers, or other materials relevant to any inquiry authorized by this division.

(7) To require information with regard to an applicant that the commissioner may deem necessary, with regard for the paramount public
 interest in ascertaining the experience, background, honesty, truthfulness, integrity, and competency of an applicant for servicing student loans, and if an applicant is an entity other than an individual, in ascertaining the honesty, truthfulness, integrity, and competency of officers, directors, or managing members of the corporation, association, or other entity, or the general partners of a partnership.

(8) To enforce by order any provision of this division.

(9) To levy fees, fines, and charges in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of the services performed in administering this division.

(10) To appoint examiners, attorneys, supervisors, experts, and special assistants as needed to effectively and efficiently
 administer this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 4.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28108.

(a) The commissioner shall have the authority to conduct investigations and examinations of an applicant or licensee as follows:

(1) For purposes of determining whether an applicant is eligible for a license, or that a licensee is complying with the provisions of this division or any regulation or order of the commissioner, the commissioner
 may access, receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information, or evidence, including, but not limited to, any of the following relating to the intent to, or the practice of, servicing student loans for borrowers:

(A) Criminal, civil, and administrative history information.

(B) Personal history and experience information, including, but not limited to, independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency.

(C) Any other documents, information, or evidence that the commissioner deems relevant to the inquiry or investigation regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of those documents, information, or evidence.

(2) For the purposes of investigating violations or complaints arising under this
 division, the commissioner may direct, subpoena, or order the attendance of, and examine under oath, any person whose testimony may be required about the student loan or account of the borrower.

(b) In making any examination or investigation authorized by this section, the commissioner may control access to any documents and records of the licensee or person under examination or investigation. The commissioner may take possession of the documents and records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the place where they are usually kept. During the period of control, no person shall remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and records except pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the commissioner. Unless the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or records of a licensee have been, or are at risk of being, altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a violation of this
 division, the licensee or owner of the documents and records shall have access to the documents or records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28110.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may by rule or order prescribe circumstances under which to accept electronic records or electronic signatures. This section shall not be deemed to require the commissioner to accept electronic records or electronic signatures.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Electronic record” means an initial license application, or material modification of that license application, and any other record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means. “Electronic records” also includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) An application, amendment, supplement, and exhibit, filed for any license, consent, or other authority.

(B) A financial statement, report, or advertising.

(C) A surety bond, rider, or endorsement thereto.

(D) An order, license, consent, or other authority.

(E) A notice of public hearing, accusation, and statement of issues in connection with any application, license, consent, or other authority.

(F) A proposed decision of a hearing officer and a decision of the commissioner.

(G) The transcripts of a hearing and correspondence between a party and the commissioner
 directly relating to the record.

(H) A release, newsletter, interpretive opinion, determination, or specific ruling.

(I) Correspondence between a party and the commissioner directly relating to any document listed in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive.

(2) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation has continuously implemented methods to accept records filed electronically, and is encouraged to continue to expand its use of electronic filings to the extent feasible, as budget, resources,
 and equipment are made available to accomplish that goal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 153.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

28111.

(a) The commissioner may require an applicant for a student loan servicer license or a student loan servicer licensee to make some or all of the filings with the commissioner through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(b) The commissioner may require an application to be made through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry, and may require fees, fingerprints, financial statements, supporting documents, changes of address, and any other information, and amendments or modifications thereto, to be submitted by applicants and licensees through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(c) The commissioner may require licensees to pay assessments through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 6.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Application for License [28112. - 28124.]

28112.

An applicant shall apply for a license by submitting all of the following to the commissioner:

(a) A completed application for a license in a form prescribed by the commissioner and signed under penalty of perjury.

(b) The sum of one hundred dollars ($100) as a fee for investigating the application, plus the cost of fingerprint processing and the criminal history record check under Section 28116, and three hundred dollars ($300) as an application fee. The investigation fee, including the amount for the criminal history record check, and the application fee are not refundable if an application is denied or withdrawn.

(c) Audited financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and acceptable to the commissioner that indicate a net worth of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(d) Subject to the commissioner’s discretion, an applicant or licensee that is a wholly owned subsidiary of a public holding company required to comply with the reporting requirements of the Securities and Exchange Commission may satisfy the requirement of subdivision (c) by submitting the annual consolidated audited financial statements filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including consolidating financial statements of the subsidiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 154, Sec. 4.   (AB 376)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

28114.

(a) The commissioner shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of every applicant for a license for purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions, state or federal arrests, and information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(b) When received, the Department of Justice shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section to the
 Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history records check. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the commissioner.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The commissioner shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for the license applicant described in subdivision (a).

(e) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee, payable by the applicant,
 sufficient to cover the costs of processing the requests pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 7.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28116.

(a) Upon the filing of an application for a license pursuant to Section 28112 and the payment of the fees, the commissioner shall investigate the applicant and its general partners and individuals owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or any individual responsible for the conduct of the applicant’s servicing activities in this state, if the applicant is a partnership. If the applicant is a corporation, trust, limited liability company, or association, including an unincorporated organization, the commissioner shall investigate the applicant, its principal officers, directors, trustee, managing members, and individuals owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the
 outstanding equity securities or any individual responsible for the conduct of the applicant’s servicing activities in this state.

(b) Upon the filing of an application for a license pursuant to Section 28128 and the payment of the fees, the commissioner shall investigate the individual responsible for the servicing activity of the licensee at the new location described in the application. The investigation may be limited to information that was not included in prior applications filed pursuant to this division. If the commissioner determines that the applicant has satisfied this division and does not find facts constituting reasons for denial, the commissioner shall issue and deliver a license to the applicant.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “principal officers” shall mean
 president, chief executive officer, treasurer, and chief financial officer, as may be applicable, and any other officer with direct responsibility for the conduct of the applicant’s servicing activities in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 8.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28117.

(a) Before an applicant is issued a license, the applicant shall file with the commissioner, in such form as the commissioner may require, an appointment irrevocably appointing the commissioner to be the applicant’s or licensee’s attorney, to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the applicant or licensee, or any of its successors, that arises under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division after such appointment has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the applicant, licensee, or successor.

(b) Service may be made by leaving a copy of
 the process at any office of the commissioner, but that service is not effective unless (1) the party making that service, who may be the commissioner, sends notice of service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the party served at its last address on file with the commissioner, and (2) an affidavit of compliance with this section by the party making service is filed in the case on or before the return date, if any, or within such further time as the court, in the case of a judicial proceeding, or the administrative agency, in the case of an administrative proceeding, allows.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 9.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28118.

The commissioner shall, when the application is complete, including having received the information from the Department of Justice, either grant a license pursuant to this division or provide a written explanation for the denial.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative July 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 28182.)
-------------------------------------------

28120.

(a) The proceedings for a denial of a license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The commissioner may deny an application for a license for any of the following reasons:

(1) A false statement of a material fact has been made in the application.

(2) The applicant or any principal officer, director, general partner, managing member, or individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity
 securities of the applicant, within the last 10 years has (A) been convicted of, or pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime or (B) committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with this division.

(3) The applicant or any principal officer, director, general partner, managing member, or individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant, has violated, or is not in material compliance with this division, or an order or rule of the commissioner.

(4) A material requirement for issuance of a license has not been met.

(5) The applicant or any principal officer, director, general partner, managing member, or individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant, has violated this division or the rules thereunder, or any similar regulatory scheme of this or a foreign jurisdiction.

(6) The applicant or any principal officer, director, general partner, managing member, or individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant, has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment or any administrative judgment by any public agency within the past seven years.

(7) The commissioner, based on its investigation of the applicant, is unable to find that the financial responsibility, criminal records, experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant and its general partners, managing members, principal officers and directors, and individuals owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant, support a finding that the business will be operated honestly, fairly, efficiently, and in accordance with the requirements of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 10.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28122.

(a) The commissioner may deem an application for a license abandoned if the applicant fails to respond to any request for information required by the commissioner or department during an investigation of the application.

(b) The commissioner shall notify the applicant, in writing, that if the applicant fails to submit responsive information within 60 days from the date the commissioner sent the written request for information, the commissioner shall deem the application abandoned.

(c) An application fee paid prior to the date an application is deemed abandoned shall not be refunded. Abandonment of an application
 pursuant to this subdivision shall not preclude the applicant from submitting a new application and fee for a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 379, Sec. 11.   (AB 38)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

28124.
